Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3206
Applicant for license; disqualification.

No license shall be issued to any individual applicant, or to any applicant other than an individual, if such individual applicant or if any one or more of those individuals participating or intending to participate directly in the management of such other applicant's business in the State of Nebraska has been convicted in the State of Nebraska or in any other state or territory of the United States of any felony or any misdemeanor involving a sex offense or involving moral turpitude; Provided, this section shall not apply when a full pardon has been given.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 6, p. 1198.